Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 4
OFFENSES - ACCESS TO BALLOT BY CANDIDATE

1-13-401. Bribery of petition signers.

Any person who offers or, with knowledge of the same, permits any person to offer for his or her benefit any bribe or promise of gain to an elector to induce him or her to sign any petition or other election paper or any person who accepts any bribe or promise of gain of any kind in the nature of a bribe as consideration for signing the same, whether such bribe or promise of gain in the nature of a bribe is offered or accepted before or after signing upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 432, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3126, § 19, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-121 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-402. Tampering with nomination papers - nomination petitions.

Any person who, being in possession of any petition, certificate of nomination, or letter of acceptance, declination, or withdrawal, wrongfully or willfully destroys, defaces, mutilates, suppresses, neglects to file, or fails to cause to be filed the same within the prescribed time or who files any such paper knowing the same, or any part thereof, to be falsely made or who adds, amends, alters, or in any way changes the information on the petition as written by a signing elector upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Any person who willfully destroys, defaces, mutilates, or suppresses any nomination petition or who willfully neglects to file or delays the delivery of the nomination petition or who conceals or removes any petition from the possession of the person authorized by law to have the custody thereof, or who aids, counsels, procures, or assists any person in doing any of said acts upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 432, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 294, § 5, effective May 29.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 311, § 26, effective May 9.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3126, § 20, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-129 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-403. Defacing of petitions other than nominating petitions.

Any person who willfully destroys, defaces, mutilates, or suppresses a petition; who willfully neglects to file or delays delivery of a petition; who conceals or removes a petition from the possession of the person authorized by law to have custody of it; or who aids, counsels, procures, or assists any person in doing any of the above acts upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 852, § 84, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1764, § 49, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3127, § 21, effective March 1, 2022.